Massachusetts, session 194th, H2224.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 19 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 3 following sections:-
Section 25. The department shall establish a comprehensive program for the research,
technology transfer, design, development and commercialization of technologies for the
treatment and support of people with mental illness and brain-based disorders and to promote
such programs the department shall provide grants to state agencies, programs, and institutions
that provide mental healthcare services to pilot cutting edge technology; including but not
limited to: (i) supporting research and innovation in mental healthcare to reduce costs to the state
and draw companies and research dollars to the commonwealth, while improving the quality of
life for people with mental illness; (ii) creating programs to grow and foster a research and
of 3

innovation eco-system for brain health technologies in Massachusetts; (iii) innovation support
for companies and researchers focused on mental healthcare; (iv) model the successful activities
the commonwealth has taken to grow and develop bio-technology, medical technology, green
technology, and computer technology industries and leverage the current innovation economy
and eco-system; and (v) close the innovation gap between the lack of innovation in mental
healthcare and in bio-technology, medical technology, green technology, and computer
technology.
The department shall establish standards for the development of the program.
Section 26. (a) There shall be a separate fund to be known as the Mental Health and
Innovation Fund, which shall be sited within the department. The fund shall to support mental
health and innovation projects in the commonwealth. The fund shall be an expendable trust fund
and shall not be subject to appropriation.
(b) There shall be credited to the fund, revenue from appropriations or other monies
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund, and gifts,
grants, private contributions, repayment of loans, investment income earned on the fund's assets,
and all other sources. Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to
the general fund.
Section 27. (a) There shall be established an oversight committee to the program
established by section 25 and the fund established by section 26, which shall make policy
recommendations to the department regarding program and funding activities.
(b) The committee shall be comprised of the following members: the commissioner of the
department of public health or a designee; the commissioner of the department of mental health
of 3

or a designee; the secretary of the executive office of public safety and security or a designee; the
commissioner of the department of children and families; the secretary of the executive office of
health and human services or a designee; and 4 individuals to be appointed by the governor, 1 of
whom shall be an individual engaged in technology and innovation, 1 of whom shall be an
individual engaged in digital health, and 1 of whom shall be a parent advocate for mental health
innovation.
(c) Chapter 268A shall apply to committee members as special state employees, but the
fund may purchase from, sell to, borrow from, loan to, contract with or otherwise deal with any
person in which any committee member is in any way interested or involved, if such interest or
involvement is disclosed in advance to the members of the committee and recorded in the
minutes of the committee meeting. No committee member having such an interest or
involvement may participate in any action of the committee relating to such person. Employment
by the commonwealth or service in any agency thereof shall not be deemed to be such an interest
or involvement.
of 3